Massachusetts, session 194th, H2477.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 
25J, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following 
section:- 
Section 25J. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise: 
''Non–English speaker'', a person who cannot speak or understand, or has difficulty with 
speaking or understanding, the English language because the speaker primarily or only uses a 
spoken language other than English. 
''Competent interpreter services'', interpreter services performed by a person who is fluent 
in English and in the language of a non–English speaker, who is trained and proficient in the skill 
and ethics of interpreting and who is knowledgeable about the specialized terms and concepts 
that need to be interpreted for purposes of receiving emergency care or treatment. 

of 3 13  (b) Every health care facility, as defined in section 25B, shall provide competent 
interpreter services in connection with all services provided to every non–English speaker who is 
a patient or who seeks appropriate care or treatment. Based on the volume and diversity of the 
non–English-speaking patients or persons seeking appropriate care or treatment, each such 
facility shall use reasonable judgment as to whether to employ, or to contract for the on-call use 
of one or more interpreters for particular languages when needed, or to use competent telephonic 
or televiewing interpreter services. However, such hospital shall only use competent telephonic 
or televiewing interpreter services in situations where there is either (1) no reasonable way to 
anticipate the need for employed or contracted interpreters for a particular language; or (2) there 
occurs, in a particular instance, an inability to provide competent interpreter services by an 
employed or contracted interpreter. 
(c) The receipt by any non–English speaker of interpreter services shall not be deemed 
the receipt of a ''public benefit'' under any provision of law restricting benefits or assistance on 
the basis of immigrant status. 
(d) Substantial compliance with the provisions of this section shall be a requirement of 
licensing or relicensing by the department under section 51, and the department may promulgate 
regulations under said section 51 for the implementation of this section. 
(e) Any non–English speaker, who is denied appropriate health care services by a health 
care facility by reason of such facility's not having exercised reasonable judgment in making 
competent interpreter services available, as required by this section, or the attorney general upon 
receiving written notice from a regulating state agency that such facility is substantially failing to 
comply with applicable interpreter requirements, shall have a right of action in the superior court 

of 3 35 against such facility for declaratory or injunctive relief. A non–English speaker bringing such 
action shall not be required to exhaust any administrative remedies that may be available to him 
and may be awarded damages for any actual harm suffered, but at least $250 in damages shall be 
awarded for each violation, together with such costs, including expert fees and attorney's fees, as 
may be reasonably incurred in such action. Such action shall be brought within three years of any 
such failure to provide competent interpreter services.